Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.902

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186.

The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement chapter 186, Laws of 2012.

[ 2012 c 186 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.